Hawaii statutes.
§386-126 Insolvency of employer not to
release insurance carrier. Every policy and contract shall contain a
provision to the effect that the insolvency or bankruptcy of the employer and
the employer's discharge therein shall not relieve the insurance carrier from
the payment of compensation for an injury suffered by a covered employee during
the life of the policy or contract. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-125;
HRS §386-126; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next